Hawaii, session 2025, GM1106.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF HAWAII:
1 SECTION 1. Section 11-16, Hawaii Revised Statutes, is
2 amended by amending subsection (a) to read as follows:
3 "(a) Any qualified person unable for any cause to appear
4 in person before the clerk for registration may register to vote
5 by mail, not later than [-thirty] ten days prior to a primary or
6 general election, through the affidavit on application for voter
7 registration or other form prescribed by the chief election
8 officer. The form shall include a self-subscribing oath for the
9 applicant to swear to the truth of the allegations in the
10 application. An applicant unable to write for reason of
11 illiteracy, blindness, or other physical disability shall have
12 the applicant's mark witnessed by a person who shall sign the
13 affidavit in the space provided. [Each—application form—shall
14 alra©—inelude—a—spaee—a—permanen-fe—afe&enhee-^aiioh-r]
15 Application forms shall be made available to any qualified
16 person through community groups, political parties, and other
17 groups prescribed by the chief election officer. Application
HB LRB 25-0332.docx

Page 2
H.B. NO. 708
1 forms shall be made available to any qualified person at the
2 time of that person's driver's license application or renewal
3 through the examiner of drivers."
4 SECTION 2. Section 15D-6, Hawaii Revised Statutes, is
5 amended by amending subsection (b) to read as follows:
6 "(b) A covered voter may use the declaration accompanying
7 a federal write-in absentee ballot to apply to register to vote
8 simultaneously with the submission of the federal write-in
9 absentee ballot, if it is received no later than [thirty] ten
10 days prior to the election pursuant to section 11-16."
11 SECTION 3. Statutory material to be repealed is bracketed
12 and stricken. New statutory material is underscored.
13 SECTION 4. This Act shall take effect upon its approval.
14
INTRODUCED BY:
By Request
JAN 1 6 2025
HB LRB 25-0332.docx

408
H.B. NO.
APPROVED this Wth day of April ,2025

HB No. 408
THE HOUSE OF REPRESENTATIVES OF THE STATE OF HAWAII
Date: February 28, 2025
Honolulu, Hawaii
We hereby certify that the above-referenced Bill on this day passed Third Reading in the
House of Representatives of the Thirty-Third Legislature of the State of Hawaii, Regular Session
of2025.
Nadine K. Nakamura
Speaker
House of Representatives
Brian L. Takeshita
Chief Clerk
House of Representatives
THE SENATE OF THE STATE OF HAWAII
Date: MAR 1 7 2025
Honolulu, Hawaii
We hereby certify that the above-referenced Bill on this day passed Third Reading in the
Senate of the Thirty-Third Legislature of the State of Hawaii, Regular Session of 2025.
President of the Senate
Carol T. Taniguchi
Clerk of the Senate